Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2701
Act, how cited.

Sections 48-2701 to
48-2711 shall be known and may be cited as the Professional Employer Organization
Registration Act.

Laws 2010, LB579, § 1.